Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1311.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 340 of Title 66, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Railroad


Crossing Transparency and Safety Accountability Act”.


B. The Rail Programs Division of the Department of


Transportation shall, on an annual basis, compile, analyze, and


review statewide railroad-crossing safety data. Such data shall


include, but not be limited to:

Req. No. 3090 Page 1


1. Collison and incident history at public railroad crossings;


2. Train volume, train speed, and operation characteristics;


3. Vehicular traffic counts and roadway characteristics at


crossings;


4. Sight-distance evaluations and engineering safety


assessments;


5. Federal hazard index calculations and any related federal


ranking methodologies; and


6. Additional criteria used by the Division in determining


railroad-crossing risk and project priority.


C. No later than February 1 annually, the Division shall


electronically submit to the President Pro Tempore of the Senate,


the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the chairs of the


Senate and House of Representatives transportation committees or


successor committees a report, to be entitled the “Annual Railroad


Crossing Safety and Improvement Report”. The report shall include,


at a minimum:


1. A complete list of all railroad-crossing improvement


projects ranked by priority for the upcoming fiscal year;


2. A detailed explanation of the criteria, formulas, and


methodologies used to establish priority rankings;


3. Identification of all crossings determined to be high-risk,


unsafe, or recommended for urgent corrective action;



Req. No. 3090 Page 2


4. A description of all projects funded or proposed for funding


under federal programs, including, but not limited to, Section 130


funds;


5. The status of all ongoing, planned, postponed, or completed


railroad-crossing improvement projects;


6. A summary of expenditures made during the preceding fiscal


year for railroad-crossing improvements, including state, federal,


and matching funds; and


7. Any recommendations for statutory, regulatory, or funding


changes necessary to enhance railroad-crossing safety in this state.


D. No later than thirty (30) days after the submission of the


report required in subsection C of this section, the report shall be


made publicly available on the website of the Department in a format


easily accessible to the public, local governments, and other


interested parties.


E. During each regular session of the Legislature, the Rail


Programs Division shall appear before the Senate and House of


Representatives transportation committees or successor committees to


present key findings from the report, provide updates on high-


priority crossings, respond to legislative inquiries regarding


prioritization criteria, and discuss ongoing railroad-crossing


safety initiatives.


F. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the


authority of the Department of Transportation to administer federal

Req. No. 3090 Page 3


railroad safety programs or to coordinate with railroad companies,


local governments, and federal agencies on matters relating to


railroad-crossing safety.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3090 MSBB 12/29/2025 12:38:55 PM





































Req. No. 3090 Page 4